Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-117
Inactive credential, defined.

Inactive credential means a credential which the credential holder has voluntarily placed on inactive status and by which action has terminated the right to practice or represent himself or herself as having an active credential.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 17.